Virginia statutes. Title 50. Partnerships.
Article 4. General Partners.

§ 50-73.27.
Admission of additional general partners.

After the filing of a limited partnership’s initial certificate of limited partnership, additional general partners may be admitted as provided in the partnership agreement or, if the partnership agreement does not provide for the admission of additional general partners, with the written consent of all partners. A person may be admitted to a limited partnership as a general partner of the limited partnership and may receive a partnership interest in the limited partnership without making a contribution or being obligated to make a contribution to the limited partnership. Unless otherwise provided in a partnership agreement, a person may be admitted to a limited partnership as a general partner of the limited partnership without acquiring a partnership interest in the limited partnership.

History.

1985, c. 607; 2015, c. 614.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 614 added the second and third sentences.

§ 50-73.28.
Events of withdrawal.

Except as approved by the written consent of all partners at the time, a person ceases to be a general partner of a limited partnership upon the happening of any of the following events:

The general partner withdraws from the limited partnership as provided in §

50-73.37

;

The general partner ceases to be a member of the limited partnership as provided in §

50-73.45

;

The general partner is removed as a general partner in accordance with the partnership agreement;

Unless otherwise provided in writing in the partnership agreement, the general partner (i) makes an assignment for the benefit of creditors; (ii) files a voluntary petition in bankruptcy; (iii) becomes the subject of an order for relief or is declared insolvent in any federal or state bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding; (iv) files a petition or answer seeking for himself any reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution or similar relief under any statute, law, or regulation; (v) files an answer or other pleading admitting or failing to contest the material allegation of a petition filed against him in any proceeding of this nature; or (vi) seeks, consents to, or acquiesces in the appointment of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the general partner or of all or any substantial part of his properties;

Unless otherwise provided in writing in the partnership agreement, if within 120 days after the commencement of any proceeding against the general partner seeking reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution or similar relief under any statute, law, or regulation, the proceeding has not been dismissed, or if within 90 days after the appointment without his consent or acquiescence of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the general partner or of all or any substantial part of his properties, the appointment is not vacated or stayed, or if within 90 days after the expiration of any such stay, the appointment is not vacated;

In the case of a general partner who is an individual, (i) his death, or (ii) the entry by a court of competent jurisdiction of an order or decree adjudicating him incapacitated;

In the case of a general partner who is acting as a general partner by virtue of being a trustee of a trust, the termination of the trust, but not merely the substitution of a new trustee;

In the case of a general partner that is a separate partnership, the dissolution and commencement of winding up of the separate partnership;

In the case of a general partner that is a corporation or other legal or commercial entity, the termination of its existence; or

In the case of an estate, the distribution by the fiduciary of the estate’s entire interest in the partnership.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702; 1990, c. 343; 1997, c. 801.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Partnership, § 97.

§ 50-73.29.
General powers and liabilities.

Except as provided in this chapter or in the partnership agreement, a general partner of a limited partnership has the rights and powers of a partner in a partnership without limited partners.

Except as provided in this chapter, a general partner of a limited partnership has the liabilities of a partner in a partnership without limited partners to persons other than the partnership and the other partners. Except as provided in this chapter or in the partnership agreement, a general partner of a limited partnership has the liabilities of a partner in a partnership without limited partners to the partnership and to the other partners.

History.

1985, c. 607.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Partnership, § 98.

§ 50-73.30.
Contributions by general partner.

A general partner of a limited partnership may make contributions to the partnership and share in the profits and losses of, and in distributions from, the limited partnership as a general partner. A general partner also may make contributions to and share in profits, losses, and distributions as a limited partner. A person who is both a general partner and a limited partner has the rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of a general partner and, except as provided in the partnership agreement, also has the powers, and is subject to the restrictions, of a limited partner to the extent of his participation in the partnership as a limited partner.

History.

1985, c. 607.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Partnership, § 94.1.

§ 50-73.31.
Voting.

The partnership agreement may grant to all or certain identified general partners the right to vote, on a per capita or any other basis, separately or with all or any class of the limited partners, on any matter.

History.

1985, c. 607.